Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-702 Review. All decisions and
findings of the commissioner made under the provisions of this article shall be
subject to review by proper proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction
in this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next